Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-353
Caregiver, defined.

Caregiver shall mean any person or entity which has assumed the responsibility for the care of a vulnerable adult voluntarily, by express or implied contract, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 6.

This section does not limit family caregiver status to an order of court or express or implied contract. This section also includes reference to any person who has assumed responsibility for the care of a vulnerable adult voluntarily.
State v. Boyd, 28 Neb. App. 874, 949 N.W.2d 540 (2020).